Hawaii statutes.
[§397-2] Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that the Hawaii occupational safety and health law does not
adequately provide for the safe operation and use of boilers, pressure systems,
amusement rides, and elevators and kindred equipment. The purpose of this law
is to assure the safe operation and use of such apparatus in Hawaii. [L 1980, c
19, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next